Nevada, session 83, SB272.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385B.060 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385B.060 1. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities
Association shall adopt rules and regulations in the manner provided
for state agencies by chapter 233B of NRS as may be necessary to
carry out the provisions of this chapter. The regulations must
include provisions governing the eligibility and participation of
homeschooled children in interscholastic activities and events. In
addition to the regulations governing eligibility, a homeschooled
child who wishes to participate must have on file with the school
district in which the child resides a current notice of intent of a
homeschooled child to participate in programs and activities
pursuant to NRS 388D.070.
2. The Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association shall
adopt regulations setting forth:
(a) The standards of safety for each event, competition or other
activity engaged in by a spirit squad of a school that is a member of
the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association, which must
substantially comply with the spirit rules of the National Federation
of State High School Associations, or its successor organization;
[and]
(b) The qualifications required for a person to become a coach
of a spirit squad [.] ; and
(c) The process by which a pupil may appeal a determination
of eligibility to participate in any sanctioned sport or other
interscholastic activity or event at the school to which the pupil
transfers made pursuant to this chapter or a regulation adopted
pursuant to this chapter if the determination imposes a hardship
on the pupil.
3. If the Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association intends
to adopt, repeal or amend a policy, rule or regulation concerning or
affecting homeschooled children, the Association shall consult with
the Northern Nevada Homeschool Advisory Council and the
Southern Nevada Homeschool Advisory Council, or their successor
organizations, to provide those Councils with a reasonable
opportunity to submit data, opinions or arguments, orally or in
writing, concerning the proposal or change. The Association shall
-
*SB272*

– 3 –
consider all written and oral submissions respecting the proposal or
change before taking final action.
4. As used in this section [, “spirit] :
(a) “Hardship” means an unusual circumstance that:
(1) Is beyond the normal control of a pupil or a parent or
legal guardian of the pupil; and
(2) Is not related to participation by the pupil in a
sanctioned sport.
(b) “Spirit squad” means any team or other group of persons
that is formed for the purpose of:
[(a)] (1) Leading cheers or rallies to encourage support for a
team that participates in a sport that is sanctioned by the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association; or
[(b)] (2) Participating in a competition against another team or
other group of persons to determine the ability of each team or
group of persons to engage in an activity specified in [paragraph
(a).] subparagraph (1).
Sec. 2. NRS 385B.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385B.130 1. Any rules and regulations adopted by the
Nevada Interscholastic Activities Association governing the
eligibility of a pupil who transfers from one school to another school
to participate in [an] a sanctioned sport or other interscholastic
activity or event must [apply] :
(a) Apply equally to public schools and to private schools that
are members of the Association [.] ; and
(b) Authorize a pupil to demonstrate a hardship by providing
evidence that emotional distress was the reason the pupil
transferred from one school to another school, which may include,
without limitation, an affidavit signed by the pupil or the written
testimony of a physician or mental health professional licensed in
this State.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a
pupil who is a child of a military family and transferred schools
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 388F of NRS is immediately
eligible to participate and practice in any sanctioned sport or other
interscholastic activity or event at the school to which the pupil
transfers.
H
-
*SB272*